Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.166

Party affiliation not required.

Under no circumstances may an individual be required to affiliate with, join, adhere to, express faith in, or declare a preference for, a political party or organization upon registering to vote.

[ 2004 c 271 s 108.]